Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 16
CONVERSION AND MERGER

7-58-1601. Definitions.

In this part 16, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Constituent entity" means an entity that is a party to a merger.

"Constituent limited cooperative association" means a limited cooperative association that is a party to a merger.

"Converting limited cooperative association" means a converting entity that is a limited cooperative association.

"Organizational documents" means articles of incorporation, bylaws, articles of organization, operating agreements, partnership agreements, and any other documents serving a similar function in the creation and governance of an entity.

"Personal liability" means personal liability for a debt, liability, or other obligation of an entity imposed, by operation of law or otherwise, on a person that co-owns or has an interest in the entity:

By the entity's organic statute solely because of the person co-owning or having an interest in the entity; or

By the entity's organizational documents under a provision of the entity's organic statute authorizing those documents to make one or more specified persons liable for all or specified parts of the entity's debts, liabilities, and other obligations solely because the person co-owns or has an interest in the entity.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 812, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this part 16, see § 7-90-102.

7-58-1602. Conversion.

A limited cooperative association may convert into any form of entity permitted by section 7-90-201 if the board of directors of the limited cooperative association adopts a plan of conversion that complies with section 7-90-201.3 and the members entitled to vote thereon, if any, if required by section 7-58-1603, approve the plan of conversion.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 813, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1603. Action on plan of conversion by converting limited cooperative association.

For a limited cooperative association to convert into another form of entity, a plan of conversion must be approved by a majority of the board of directors, or a greater percentage if required by the articles or bylaws, and the board of directors must call a members meeting to consider the plan of conversion, hold the meeting not later than ninety days after approval of the plan by the board, and mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to each member:

The plan, or a summary of the plan and a statement of the manner in which a copy of the plan in a record may be reasonably obtained by a member;

A recommendation that the members approve the plan of conversion or, if the board determines that because of a conflict of interest or any other reason it should not make a favorable recommendation, the basis for that determination;

A statement of any condition of the board's submission of the plan of conversion to the members; and

Notice of the meeting at which the plan of conversion will be considered, which notice must be given in the same manner as notice of a special meeting of members.

Subject to subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a plan of conversion must be approved by:

At least a majority of the voting power of members present at a members meeting called under subsection (1) of this section; and

If the limited cooperative association has investor members, at least a majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the articles or bylaws require a greater percentage vote by patron members.

The articles or bylaws may require that the percentage of votes required under paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section is:

A different percentage that is not less than a majority of members voting at the meeting;

Measured against the voting power of all members; or

A combination of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (3).

The vote required to approve a plan of conversion must not be less than the vote required for the members of the limited cooperative association to amend the articles of organization.

Consent in a record to a plan of conversion by a member must be delivered to the limited cooperative association before delivery of a statement of conversion for filing pursuant to section 7-58-1608 (1) if, as a result of the conversion, the member will have:

Personal liability for an obligation of the association; or

An obligation or liability for an additional contribution.

Subject to subsection (5) of this section and any contractual rights, after a conversion is approved and at any time before the effective date of the conversion, a converting limited cooperative association may amend a plan of conversion or abandon the planned conversion:

As provided in the plan; and

Except as prohibited by the plan, by the same affirmative vote of the board of directors and of the members as was required to approve the plan.

The voting requirements for districts, classes, or voting groups under section 7-58-404 apply to approval of a conversion under this part 16.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 813, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1604. Merger.

One or more domestic limited cooperative associations may merge into another domestic entity if the board of directors of each association that is a party to the merger and each other entity that is a party to the merger adopts a plan of merger complying with section 7-90-203.3 and the members entitled to vote thereon, if any, of each such association, if required by sections 7-58-1605 and 7-58-1606, approve the plan of merger.

One or more domestic limited cooperative associations may merge with one or more foreign entities if:

The merger is permitted by section 7-90-203 (2);

The foreign entity complies with section 7-90-203.7 if it is the surviving entity of the merger; and

Each domestic limited cooperative association complies with the applicable provisions of sections 7-58-1605 and 7-58-1606 and, if it is the surviving association of the merger, with section 7-58-1608 (2).

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 815, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1605. Notice and action on plan of merger by constituent limited cooperative association.

For a limited cooperative association to merge with another entity, a plan of merger must be approved by a majority vote of the board of directors or a greater percentage if required by the association's articles or bylaws.

The board of directors shall call a members meeting to consider a plan of merger approved by the board, hold the meeting not later than ninety days after approval of the plan by the board, and mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to each member:

The plan of merger, or a summary of the plan and a statement of the manner in which a copy of the plan in a record may be reasonably obtained by a member;

A recommendation that the members approve the plan of merger or, if the board determines that because of conflict of interest or any other reason it should not make a favorable recommendation, the basis for that determination;

A statement of any condition of the board's submission of the plan of merger to the members; and

Notice of the meeting at which the plan of merger will be considered, which notice must be given in the same manner as notice of a special meeting of members.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 815, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1606. Approval or abandonment of merger by members.

Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a plan of merger must be approved by:

At least a majority of the voting power of members present at a members meeting called under section 7-58-1605 (2); and

If the limited cooperative association has investor members, at least a majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the articles or bylaws require a greater percentage vote by patron members.

The articles or bylaws may provide that the percentage of votes required under paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section is:

A different percentage that is not less than a majority of members voting at the meeting;

Measured against the voting power of all members; or

A combination of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (2).

The vote required to approve a plan of merger must not be less than the vote required for the members of the limited cooperative association to amend the articles of organization.

Consent in a record to a plan of merger by a member must be delivered to the limited cooperative association before delivery of a statement of merger for filing pursuant to section 7-58-1608 (2) if, as a result of the merger, the member will have:

Personal liability for an obligation of the association; or

An obligation or liability for an additional contribution.

Subject to subsection (4) of this section and any contractual rights, after a merger is approved, and at any time before the effective date of the merger, a limited cooperative association that is a party to the merger may approve an amendment to the plan of merger or approve abandonment of the planned merger:

As provided in the plan; and

Except as limited by the plan, with the same affirmative vote of the board of directors and of the members as was required to approve the plan.

The voting requirements for districts, classes, or voting groups under section 7-58-404 apply to approval of a merger under this part 16.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 816, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1607. Merger of parent and subsidiary.

Notwithstanding sections 7-58-1605 and 7-58-1606, by complying with this section, any parent limited cooperative association owning one hundred percent of the voting power, memberships, or interests of a subsidiary may either merge the subsidiary into itself or merge itself into the subsidiary.

Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the boards of directors of the parent association and of the subsidiary shall adopt by resolution a plan of merger that states the following:

The entity names of the parent association and subsidiary and the entity name of the surviving entity;

The terms and conditions of the proposed merger;

The manner and basis of converting the shares of the parent association and subsidiary into shares, obligations, or other securities of the surviving entity or any other limited cooperative association into money or other property in whole or part;

Any amendments to the organizational documents of the surviving party to be effected by the merger; and

Any other provisions relating to the merger as are deemed necessary or desirable.

The members of the parent association are not required to vote on the merger unless the articles, bylaws, or the board require otherwise; except that if, as a result of the merger, the voting shares, memberships, or other interests of members of the parent association would be materially altered, then the members of the parent association have the right to vote on the plan of merger. If the members of the parent association have the right to vote on the plan of merger, the parent association shall mail a copy or summary of the plan of merger to each member of the parent association who has the right to vote on the plan. Notice and meeting requirements as provided for in this article shall apply.

If the members of the parent limited cooperative association have the right to vote on the plan of merger, unless the articles, bylaws, or the board requires a greater vote, the plan of merger must be approved by a majority of the members of the parent association present and voting on the plan in person or in any other manner authorized by the association pursuant to section 7-58-515.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 816, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1608. Filings required for conversion or merger.

After a plan of conversion is approved, the converting entity shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of conversion pursuant to section 7-90-201.7.

After a plan of merger is approved, the surviving entity shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of merger pursuant to section 7-90-203.7.

If the plan of conversion or merger provides for amendments to the organizational documents of the converting or surviving entity, the converting or surviving entity shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of amendment effecting the amendments.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 817, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1609. Effect of conversion or merger.

The effect of a conversion is determined by section 7-90-202.

The effect of a merger is determined by section 7-90-204.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 818, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1610. Consolidation.

Constituent entities that are limited cooperative associations or foreign cooperatives may agree to call a merger a consolidation under this part 16.

All provisions governing mergers or using the term merger in this part 16 apply equally to mergers that the constituent entities choose to call consolidations under subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 818, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1611. Part not exclusive.

This part 16 does not prohibit a limited cooperative association from being converted or merged under law other than this part 16.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 818, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.